Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6322.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 28c. (1) In addition to in-service training or on-the-job training, an unlicensed or uncertified direct care staff member must be educated to understand the physical and emotional needs of the population the unlicensed or uncertified direct care staff member is hired to serve by completing the following courses within 120 days after the date of hire: (a) Empathy and simulation of the aging process. For an adult foster care facility that serves residents who are 50 years of age or older, the course must provide staff members with the experience of sensory challenges related to aging and the emotional challenges that come with the loss of independence, home, and relationships with family and friends to understand the factors that influence the aging experience, the physical changes of the aging body, and the emotional challenges presented by the physical changes of the aging body. The preferred mode of instruction for the course described in this subdivision is in person. A direct care staff member must demonstrate comprehension by passing an examination related to the course content. (b) Dignity and sensitivity. The course must include basic techniques for effectively and compassionately communicating with the elderly, including those experiencing hearing loss, dementia, or other issues that impair communication for the population being served, and how to handle and defuse difficult situations in a respectful manner. The preferred mode of instruction for the course described in this subdivision is in person. A direct care staff member must demonstrate comprehension by passing an examination related to the course content. (c) Death and dying. The course must provide basic understanding of end-of-life issues and the impact on the resident, including appropriate behavior and communication with the resident and resident's family and address the challenges of supporting an individual who is dying. The course must identify available support resources for staff who require support in managing the emotional impact of death related responsibilities. (d) Resident rights. The course must instruct staff members on all rights granted to the resident. The preferred mode of instruction for the course described in this subdivision is in person. The staff member must demonstrate comprehension by passing an examination related to the course content. (e) Basic medication training for staff assisting with self-administration. The course must be provided by a registered nurse to an unlicensed direct care worker employed by the adult foster care facility who will be assisting in self-administration of medication. The course must include appropriate medication handling, rights of medication pass, 3 safety checks, how to complete a medication administration record, missed dose policy and procedures, reading and comprehending prescription labels, communication tips with prescribers and pharmacy, common errors in passing medications, proper storage and disposal of medications, ethics with an emphasis on compliance and integrity to include procedures for reporting errors and mishaps, and asking questions when in doubt to ensure safety of residents. The course described in this subdivision must be conducted annually. The staff member must demonstrate comprehension by passing an examination related to the course content. (f) Understanding dementia. The course must instruct the staff member on the fundamentals of dementia, including how to recognize signs of dementia, effects of dementia on the resident, effective communication, and proper care standards of a resident with dementia. The preferred mode of instruction for the course described in this subdivision is in person. The staff member must demonstrate comprehension by passing an examination related to the course content. (g) Identifying and reporting abuse, neglect, and exploitation. The preferred mode of instruction for the course described in this subdivision is in person. The staff member must demonstrate comprehension by passing an examination related to the course content. (2) An adult foster care facility shall require a registered nurse or a pharmacist for unlicensed staff who will be performing medication administration to take an annual medication administration training course. The registered nurse or a pharmacist must demonstrate comprehension by passing an examination related to the course content. The training must include all of the following: (a) Diabetic training on how to administer an insulin injection. This training must include all of the following: (i) The different types of insulin, how fast insulin works, and the timing of insulin administration to mealtimes. (ii) Adverse reactions, including hyperglycemic and hypoglycemic reactions to insulin, and interventions. (iii) Dietary requirements while on insulin. (iv) Methods for obtaining and interpreting blood glucose levels. (v) Documentation of blood glucose levels in a resident's medication administration record. (vi) When to administer each type of insulin because of a recent blood glucose measurement and if the resident will be eating a full meal before administration of insulin. (vii) Insulin storage. (viii) Injection techniques and site rotation. (ix) Sliding scales for adjusting the amount of insulin to inject based on a fluctuation of glucose level. (x) A hands-on demonstration component to ensure the staff member understands skills and concepts and is considered competent to read insulin orders, measure and inject insulin, and follow the procedures taught in the training. (b) Controlled substance administration, including the types, uses, and effects of controlled substances, and accountability, including chain of custody procedures and documentation. (c) How and when to administer as needed medications. (d) How and when to administer medications with parameters, including how to measure blood pressure, blood glucose levels, and heart rate. (3) The adult foster care facility must complete a medication administration skills validation form, unless prior authorization for a substitute form has been granted, in writing, by the department, for all unlicensed staff who will be performing or supervising staff performing medication administration duties. The adult foster care facility must keep the medication administration skills validation form in the staff member's personnel record and provide the form to the department on request. (4) An adult foster care facility must conduct training assessments annually, separate from examinations given on completion of a training or educational course to ensure that staff members recall what they learned during training and educational programs and are implementing the knowledge acquired appropriately while providing care. Assessments conducted under this subsection must include review of past incidents, accidents, and medication errors. The annual assessment must be documented and maintained in the staff member's personnel file and made available to the department on request. (5) A staff member shall not have unsupervised contact with a resident before completing the training and educational course requirements. (6) A licensee must maintain a written training plan for all staff members and a record of all training and educational requirements that must be retained for a period of 3 years that includes all of the following information: (a) The staff member's name and title. (b) The date the course was taken and completed. (c) Documentation of successful completion of the course. (7) Acceptable sponsors of the training required in this section include any of the following: (a) A nationally recognized or state-recognized health-related organization. (b) A state or federal agency. (c) An educational program that has been approved by any board created under article 15 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.16101 to 333.18838, except under part 188 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.18801 to 333.18838, for initial licensure or registration or for the accumulation of continuing education credits. (d) An accredited college or university. (8) Acceptable modalities of the training required in this section include any of the following: (a) A teleconference or webinar that allows live synchronous interaction that provides for the opportunity for participants to interact with the instructor and other participants. (b) A live presentation that provides for the opportunity for participants to interact with the instructor and other participants. (c) An asynchronous teleconference or webinar. If the training method does not involve interaction between the faculty and participants, the facility or program must make available to the participants during the training a trained individual to answer questions and respond to issues raised during the training (9) After 1 year of employment at an adult foster care facility, a direct care worker, who is not a certified nurse assistant, must annually complete an additional 8 hours of continuing education. The subject matter of the continuing education must address the unique needs of residents in an adult foster care facility. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S00621'25) or House Bill No. 6320 (request no. H00621'25). (b) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S05577'25) or House Bill No. 6321 (request no. H05577'25).